Utah statutes.
26-33a-110.   Penalties.

(1)  Any use, release, or publication of health care data contrary to the provisions of Sections 26-33a-108 and 26-33a-109 is a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not relieve the person or organization responsible for that use, release, or publication from civil liability.



Enacted by Chapter 305, 1990 General Session

